District of Columbia statutes.
50-715

Financial and operational incentives for use of alternative fuels.

(a)

Not later than 180 days after March 14, 1995, the Mayor, where feasible, shall submit to the Council proposed legislation, regulations, or a combination thereof, that provides for financial and operational incentives for the commercial fleet use of alternative fuels.

(b)

Where feasible, as determined by the Mayor, the proposal shall include the following:

(1)

Income tax credits for alternative fuels vehicles and certain fueling property that:

(A)

Are based on § 179A of the United States Internal Revenue Code; and

(B)

Are comparable to similar credits allowed by 1 or more states adjacent to the District;

(2)

A motor fuel tax exception for alternative fuel vehicles that is comparable to similar credits allowed by 1 or more states adjacent to the District;

(3)

Preferential parking or loading use on District owned parking lots and curbside parking spaces (to be known as “green curb parking and loading areas”) for covered fleet using alternative fuels;

(4)

Requirements that the District purchase qualified second market vehicles to help establish a long term viable market for alternative fuel vehicles; and

(5)

The creation of a fund by the District to ensure competitive resale values of used alternative fuel vehicles, the funds for which would derive from gifts and other contributions.

(c)

The incentives shall be structured and administered so as to qualify for recognition by the EPA for air quality standards attainment purposes.

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 16
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(g), 41 DCR 7178

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-2014.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of School Proximity Traffic Calming Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-222, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3844).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) additions, see § 2 of School Proximity Traffic Calming Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-222, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3844).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of a new Chapter 21 of Title 40, consisting of § 40-2101 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the School Proximity Traffic Calming Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-529, December 16, 1998, 46 DCR 478).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 40-2101 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the School Proximity Traffic Calming Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-43, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3623).

References in Text

“ Section 179A of the United States Internal Revenue Code”, referred to in (b)(1)(A), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 179A.